Washington statutes.
RCW 10.116.050

Peace officers—Reasonably identifiable.

All law enforcement agencies shall adopt policies and procedures to ensure that uniformed peace officers while on duty and in the performance of their official duties are reasonably identifiable. For purposes of this section, "reasonably identifiable" means that the peace officer's uniform clearly displays the officer's name or other information that members of the public can see and the agency can use to identify the peace officer.

[ 2021 c 320 s 6.]